Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Retirement, Retirement Allowances, and
Disability Benefits

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Public School Employees Retirement System, Chapter 513-2-1.

47-4-100.
Normal, early, and delayed retirement; vesting of right to a retirement benefit.

The normal retirement date of a member shall be the first day of the month coinciding with or next following the date he or she reaches the age of 65, except that the normal retirement date of a member who is age 64 or over on January 1, 1970, shall be January 1, 1971. A member shall retire on his or her normal retirement date except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

The early retirement date of a member shall be the first day of the month coinciding with or next following the date he or she attains the age of 60. A member may elect to retire at his or her early retirement date and receive the retirement benefit provided by subsection (d) of Code Section 47-4-101.

The right to a retirement benefit under this chapter shall vest in a member who has ten or more years of creditable service if the member has not withdrawn the member’s contributions. Except as otherwise provided in Article 2 of Chapter 1 of this title, a member’s accumulated contributions shall be 100 percent vested and nonforfeitable at all times. A member shall be 100 percent vested in all benefits under the plan upon attainment of normal retirement age. Upon attaining the member’s normal retirement age or the member’s early retirement age, the member shall begin receiving the appropriate retirement benefit provided by Code Section 47-4-101.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 6; Ga. L. 1971, p. 917, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1197, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 22/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 50/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, in subsection (e), throughout the subsection, substituted “the member” for “he” and substituted “the member’s” for “his”, and added the second and third sentences.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “or she” or “or her” in subsections (a) and (b); substituted “subsection (c)” for “subsections (b) through (e)” in the last sentence of subsection (a); deleted former subsections (b) and (c), which read: “(b) At the request of his local unit of administration, a member may remain actively employed beyond his normal retirement date on a year-to-year basis as shall be mutually agreed upon by the member and his local unit of administration. In such cases, the member shall retire on the first day of the month coinciding with or next following the end of the last agreed upon period of employment, which date shall be the delayed retirement date of the member.

“(c) Any person who was a public school employee for a period of ten or more years at any time after July 1, 1945, and who on April 14, 1971, had attained age 60 or over shall be eligible for membership and may retire. The effective date of such individual’s retirement shall be the first day of the first month which occurs at least 30 days after receipt of his application for retirement by the board of trustees. Such effective date shall be the early retirement date of the member.”; redesignated former subsections (d) and (e) as present subsections (b) and (c), respectively; and substituted “The early” for “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the early” at the beginning of present subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 885, § 1, which would have amended subsection (a) of this Code section, was not concurrently funded as required by §

47-20-50

and, therefore, did not become law and was repealed on July 1, 1988. See the state auditor’s report at Ga. L. 1988, p. CCLXXXIV. This Act was subsequently repealed by Ga. L. 1989, p. 250, § 1, effective March 30, 1989.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-4-101.
Retirement benefits payable upon normal, early, or delayed retirement.

Any member may retire and upon application to the board receive the retirement benefits set forth in this Code section after obtaining a minimum of ten years of creditable service. The effective date of retirement shall be the first of the month in which the application is received by the board, provided that no retirement application will, in any case, be effective earlier than the first of the month following the final month of the applicant’s employment. If a member retires before obtaining ten years of creditable service, he or she shall receive a lump sum refund of his or her accumulated contributions made under the retirement system to the date of his or her retirement.

Upon retirement on the normal retirement date, a member shall receive a monthly retirement benefit, payment of which shall commence on the effective date of retirement and which shall be payable on the first day of each month thereafter during the member’s lifetime. The amount of each monthly retirement payment shall be $16.50 multiplied by the number of the member’s years of creditable service. The retirement benefit provided under this subsection shall be payable to those members who have already retired under this chapter as well as those members who retire in the future; provided, however, that no benefit increase above $15.00 per month shall be applied to the benefit of persons who were retired on the effective date of this Act. If the General Assembly at any time appropriates funds expressly intended to fund the benefits provided in this subsection and such amount so appropriated is not sufficient to fund the maximum amount allowable, then the retirement benefit otherwise payable under this subsection shall be reduced pro rata by the board in accordance with the funds actually appropriated by the General Assembly for such purpose, but in no event shall the retirement benefit be less than $14.75 multiplied by the member’s years of creditable service.

Subject to the terms and limitations of this subsection, the board of trustees is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the retirement allowance paid up to the maximum benefit provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection. Such method shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of trustees;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

Upon retirement on his delayed retirement date, a member shall receive a monthly retirement benefit, payment of which shall commence on his delayed effective date of retirement and which shall be payable on the first day of each month thereafter during his lifetime. The amount of each monthly retirement benefit shall be computed in the same manner as for a normal retirement benefit and shall be based on the number of years of creditable service as of the member’s delayed retirement date.

Any member who exercises his right to retire at an early retirement date pursuant to subsections (c) through (e) of Code Section 47-4-100 shall receive a monthly retirement benefit which shall begin on the early effective date of retirement. Such benefit shall be payable on the first day of each month thereafter during his lifetime. The amount of each monthly retirement benefit shall be computed in the same manner as for a normal retirement benefit and shall be based on the number of years of creditable service as of the member’s early retirement date, provided that such benefit shall be actuarially reduced at the rate of one-half of 1 percent for each full month that such member is under 65 years of age.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 7; Ga. L. 1971, p. 917, § 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1197, §§ 4-6; Ga. L. 1977, p. 597, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1787, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1859, § 5; Ga. L. 1988, p. 880, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1154, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 151, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1131, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 409, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 1010, § 2/HB 1020; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1284, § 2/SB 246.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in paragraph (b)(1), in the second sentence, substituted “$16.50” for “$15.00”, added “; provided, however, that no benefit increase above $15.00 per month shall be applied to the benefit of persons who were retired on the effective date of this Act” to the end of the third sentence, and substituted “$14.75” for “$12.00” in the last sentence.

47-4-102.
Optional retirement benefits.

At any time prior to his retirement a member may elect or may revoke a previous election and make a new election to have his retirement benefit payable under one of the options set forth in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section in lieu of the lifetime income he is otherwise entitled to receive. The benefit shall be paid in accordance with the terms of such option elected. Election of any option shall be made by the member in writing and shall be subject to approval by the board.

The amount of any optional retirement benefit set forth in this Code section shall be the actuarial equivalent of the amount of benefit that would otherwise be payable to the member under Code Section 47-4-101.

Option A, the joint and survivor option, shall consist of a decreased retirement benefit which shall be payable to the member for life and shall continue after his death to the surviving joint annuitant in the same amount or in such smaller amount as he may designate. The election of this option shall be null and void if either the member or his joint annuitant dies before his normal retirement date.

Option B, the period certain and life option, shall consist of a decreased retirement benefit commencing on the date of retirement and payable on the first day of each month during the lifetime of the member, provided that if the member dies prior to having received the elected number of guaranteed monthly retirement payments, such remaining guaranteed payments shall continue to his designated beneficiary.

Any other provisions of this Code section or of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the board of trustees may, by rule or regulation, require that when a member or a retired member dies and the beneficiary is a person other than the surviving spouse of the member, the benefits payable to the beneficiary shall be paid to the beneficiary within a definite time period immediately following the death of the member or retired member.

As used in this subsection, the term “retired member” means a person retired under this chapter who was unmarried at the time of his or her retirement.

In the event a retired member marries subsequent to his or her retirement, the retired member may elect to begin receiving an actuarially reduced benefit of equivalent value and establish on behalf of the spouse Option A or B. Such election must be made by December 31, 1998, or within six months after the date of marriage, whichever date is later.

This subsection applies to retired members who retired at any time prior to July 1, 1998, as well as to those who retire on or after that date.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 8; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1197, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 810, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 542, § 1.

47-4-103.
Disability retirement benefits; determination of disability.

Any member who obtains a minimum of 15 years of creditable service and who becomes totally and permanently disabled to the extent that he is unable to perform the duties of his employment shall be entitled to receive a disability retirement benefit equal to the full retirement benefit under subsection (b) of Code Section 47-4-101 which benefit shall be based on the number of years of service at the time he became disabled. The disability of any member applying for disability retirement benefits shall be determined by the board in the same manner and under the same procedure as disability of state employees is determined under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia. Disability retirement benefits shall become payable within 30 days after such disability is determined by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1197, § 7.

47-4-104.
Benefits payable upon the death of a member; refunds to members whose employment has been terminated.

If a member dies prior to his normal retirement date, his beneficiary shall receive a lump sum refund of his accumulated contributions made under the retirement system to the member’s date of death, unless the member retired before his normal retirement date, in which event the refund of contributions shall be reduced by the amount of retirement benefits paid prior to the member’s death.

If a member who has not elected an optional form of payment under Code Section 47-4-102, dies on or after his normal retirement date but prior to receiving benefits totaling his accumulated contributions to his retirement date, a death benefit shall be payable in a lump sum to the beneficiary of the member. The amount of such death benefit shall be the difference between total benefits actually paid to the member and his accumulated contributions.

If a member who has elected an optional form of payment under Code Section 47-4-102 dies on or after his normal retirement date but prior to his actual retirement, a death benefit will be payable as provided for by the option elected, determined as if the member had retired on the day preceding the date of his death.

If a member who has elected an optional form of payment under Code Section 47-4-102 dies subsequent to actual retirement, a death benefit shall be payable as provided for by the option elected.

If the employment of a member is terminated either voluntarily or involuntarily at any time prior to his normal retirement date, he shall be entitled to a refund of his accumulated contributions to the date of his termination. Any such terminated member who withdraws his accumulated contributions and who is subsequently reemployed as a public school employee shall be entitled to reestablish the service credited to him at the time of his termination after he has been continuously reemployed for a minimum of two years. In order to reestablish such service, the reemployed member must pay to the board the amount withdrawn from the fund at the time of his previous termination, plus regular interest on such amount from the date of such withdrawal to the date such payment is made to the board.

If a member at least 60 years of age and having at least ten years of creditable service dies before retirement, the member’s designated beneficiary shall receive for life the lesser retirement benefit which would be payable under Option A. As used in this subsection, the term “beneficiary” shall not include the estate of the member, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (3) of Code Section 47-4-2.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 998, § 9; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1197, § 9; Ga. L. 1979, p. 884, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 527, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-4-105.
Postretirement benefit adjustments.

The board is authorized to grant postretirement benefit adjustments from time to time for the purpose of maintaining essentially no less purchasing power for persons receiving benefits pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Granting postretirement benefit adjustments shall be based on the following factors:

The recommendations of the actuary for the retirement system;

Maintaining the actuarial soundness of the retirement system;

Appropriations by the General Assembly if appropriations are made for the purpose of granting such postretirement benefit adjustments; and

Such other factors as the board finds relevant.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-4-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 879, § 1.

47-4-106.
Return to public service of retired member.

If any retired member who has not yet reached normal retirement age returns to service as a public school employee in any position which normally requires membership in this retirement system, such member’s retirement benefit shall cease and the retired member shall reestablish active membership in this retirement system. The member shall have the same creditable service which the member possessed at the time of retirement and shall accumulate additional creditable service so long as such active membership continues. Upon cessation of such service, or upon attainment of normal retirement age and cessation of contributions, the retired member, after proper notification to the board, shall receive a retirement benefit based on the member’s total accrued service reduced by any amount already received prior to reemployment.

If any retired member who has reached normal retirement age returns to service as a public school employee in any position that would normally require membership in this retirement system, such member shall have the option to:

Contribute to the system, in which event the member’s retirement benefit shall cease and the retired member shall reestablish active membership in this retirement system. The member shall have the same creditable service which the member possessed at the time of retirement and shall accumulate additional creditable service so long as such active membership continues. Upon cessation of such service, the retired member, after proper notification to the board, shall receive a retirement benefit based on the member’s total accrued service reduced by any amounts already received; or

Not contribute to the system, in which event the member’s retirement benefit shall not cease, and no additional benefits will accrue.

Any employer which employs a retired member shall within 30 days of the employee’s accepting employment notify the board of trustees in writing stating the name of the member and, if the retired member is age 65 or older, shall provide in writing from the retired member his or her election either to discontinue benefits and resume contributions, or to continue receiving retirement benefits and accrue no additional credits under the retirement system. Any employer which fails to notify the board of trustees as required by this subsection shall reimburse the retirement system for any benefits wrongfully paid. It shall be the duty of the retired member seeking employment by the employer to notify the employer of his or her retirement status prior to accepting such position. If a retired member fails to so notify the employer and the employer becomes liable to the retirement system, the member shall hold the employer harmless for all such liability.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-4-106

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 23/HB 202; Ga. L. 2010, p. 427, § 11/HB 969.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 11, 2009.

The 2010 amendment,

effective May 24, 2010, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); in the last sentence of subsection (a), inserted “or upon attainment of normal retirement age and cessation of contributions,” near the beginning and added “reduced by any amount already received prior to reemployment” at the end; and added subsections (b) and (c).